Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Operator” means a person that:
(A) Offers a person the opportunity to participate in a sport, fitness or recreational  ac-
tivity; or
(B) Operates or provides a facility or place where a person can participate in a  sport,
fitness or recreational activity.
(b) “Sport, fitness or recreational activity” means an indoor or outdoor  activity involving
elements of inherent risk,  including but not limited to hunting, fishing, swimming, boating,
rafting, biking, camping, skiing, snowboarding, winter sports, team and individual sports,
climbing, equestrian and rodeo activities, hiking, outfitter guiding, environmental restoration
and maintenance, ocean and water sports, motorized recreation, athletic or fitness competi-
tions, fitness activities and training activities.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an operator  may require a par-
ticipant in a sport, fitness  or recreational activity who is 18 years of age or older, or a parent
or guardian on behalf of a participant in a  sport, fitness or recreational activity who is under
18 years of age, to release the operator from  any claim for damages for injuries to the par-
ticipant resulting from ordinary negligence  that arises out of the sport, fitness or recre-
ational activity,  or out of volunteering to maintain facilities or places used for a sport,
fitness or recreational activity, if the participant or parent or guardian voluntarily signs a
clear and unambiguous written release disclosing risks associated with the sport, fitness or
recreational activity or volunteering and waiving the operator’s  liability for damages for in-
juries resulting from those risks. A release described in this  subsection is not per se
unconscionable or void as contrary to public policy.
(3) An operator may not require a person to release  the operator from the following
types of claims:
(a) Claims  for greater than ordinary negligence, including gross negligence, reckless
conduct, willful misconduct or intentional torts.
(b) Claims for negligence per se.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1517 (SB 1517-B) Page 1
(c) Claims relating to the maintenance or inspection of safety equipment supplied by  the
operator and used  in connection with the sport, fitness or recreational activity or volun-
teering.
(d) Claims relating to negligent safety-related training  of an employee or agent of the
operator whose conduct causes injury.
(e) Claims relating to abuse, as defined in ORS 419B.005, or physical or sexual  assault of
an adult.
(f) Claims relating to the negligent  hiring, training, credentialing, supervision or re-
tention of an  employee or agent of the operator whose conduct that causes injury constitutes
gross negligence, reckless conduct, willful misconduct or an intentional tort.
(g) Claims relating to the  operation or use of any vehicle, including but not limited to
automobiles, buses,  vans, snowmobiles, snow cats, all-terrain vehicles, utility terrain vehicles
or side-by-sides, including if the vehicle is used for transportation to or  from the location
where the sport, fitness or recreational activity or volunteering takes place, unless  the par-
ticipant uses the vehicle as part of the  sport, fitness or recreational activity or volunteering
itself.
(4) A release that  is broader than the release described in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section shall be construed within the limits stated in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(5) In a claim for damages for injuries to a participant sustained while  the participant is
engaged in a sport,  fitness or recreational activity or volunteering to maintain facilities or
places used for a sport, fitness  or recreational activity, whether a risk is inherent to the
sport, fitness or recreational activity or volunteering is a question of law.
(6) This section does not limit or modify the provisions of ORS 30.970 to 30.990.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2026 Act applies to releases, whether executed before, on
or after the effective date of  this 2026 Act, of claims that arise on or after the effective date
of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 24, 2026
Repassed by Senate March 6, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1517 (SB 1517-B) Page 2